Illinois, session 104th, SB1824.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-5-3.1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-3.1)7    Sec. 5-5-3.1. Factors in mitigation. 8    (a) The following grounds shall be accorded weight in 9favor of withholding or minimizing a sentence of imprisonment:10        (1) The defendant's criminal conduct neither caused 11    nor threatened serious physical harm to another. 12        (2) The defendant did not contemplate that his 13    criminal conduct would cause or threaten serious physical 14    harm to another.15        (3) The defendant acted under a strong provocation.16        (4) There were substantial grounds tending to excuse 17    or justify the defendant's criminal conduct, though 18    failing to establish a defense.19        (5) The defendant's criminal conduct was induced or 20    facilitated by someone other than the defendant.21        (6) The defendant has compensated or will compensate 22    the victim of his criminal conduct for the damage or 23    injury that he sustained.  SB1824- 2 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1        (7) The defendant has no history of prior delinquency 2    or criminal activity or has led a law-abiding life for a 3    substantial period of time before the commission of the 4    present crime.5        (8) The defendant's criminal conduct was the result of 6    circumstances unlikely to recur.7        (9) The character and attitudes of the defendant 8    indicate that he is unlikely to commit another crime.9        (10) The defendant is particularly likely to comply 10    with the terms of a period of probation.11        (11) (Blank).12        (12) The imprisonment of the defendant would endanger 13    his or her medical condition.14        (13) The defendant was a person with an intellectual 15    disability as defined in Section 5-1-13 of this Code.16        (14) The defendant sought or obtained emergency 17    medical assistance for an overdose and was convicted of a 18    Class 3 felony or higher possession, manufacture, or 19    delivery of a controlled, counterfeit, or look-alike 20    substance or a controlled substance analog under the 21    Illinois Controlled Substances Act or a Class 2 felony or 22    higher possession, manufacture or delivery of 23    methamphetamine under the Methamphetamine Control and 24    Community Protection Act.25        (15) At the time of the offense, the defendant is or 26    had been the victim of domestic violence and the effects   SB1824- 3 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1    of the domestic violence tended to excuse or justify the 2    defendant's criminal conduct. As used in this paragraph 3    (15), "domestic violence" means abuse as defined in 4    Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986. 5        (16) At the time of the offense, the defendant was 6    suffering from a serious mental illness which, though 7    insufficient to establish the defense of insanity, 8    substantially affected his or her ability to understand 9    the nature of his or her acts or to conform his or her 10    conduct to the requirements of the law. 11        (17) At the time of the offense, the defendant was 12    suffering from post-partum depression or post-partum 13    psychosis which was either undiagnosed or untreated, or 14    both, and this temporary mental illness tended to excuse 15    or justify the defendant's criminal conduct and the 16    defendant has been diagnosed as suffering from post-partum 17    depression or post-partum psychosis, or both, by a 18    qualified medical person and the diagnoses or testimony, 19    or both, was not used at trial. In this paragraph (17):20            "Post-partum depression" means a mood disorder 21        which strikes many women during and after pregnancy 22        which usually occurs during pregnancy and up to 12 23        months after delivery. This depression can include 24        anxiety disorders.25            "Post-partum psychosis" means an extreme form of 26        post-partum depression which can occur during   SB1824- 4 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1        pregnancy and up to 12 months after delivery. This can 2        include losing touch with reality, distorted thinking, 3        delusions, auditory and visual hallucinations, 4        paranoia, hyperactivity and rapid speech, or mania. 5        (18) The defendant is pregnant or is the parent of a 6    child or infant whose well-being will be negatively 7    affected by the parent's absence. Circumstances to be 8    considered in assessing this factor in mitigation include: 9            (A) that the parent is breastfeeding the child; 10            (B) the age of the child, with strong 11        consideration given to avoid disruption of the 12        caregiving of an infant, pre-school or school-age 13        child by a parent;14            (C) the role of the parent in the day-to-day 15        educational and medical needs of the child; 16            (D) the relationship of the parent and the child; 17            (E) any special medical, educational, or 18        psychological needs of the child; 19            (F) the role of the parent in the financial 20        support of the child; 21            (G) the likelihood that the child will be adjudged 22        a dependent minor under Section 2-4 and declared a 23        ward of the court under Section 2-22 of the Juvenile 24        Court Act of 1987; 25            (H) the best interest of the child. 26        Under this Section, the defendant shall have the right   SB1824- 5 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1    to present a Family Impact Statement at sentencing, which 2    the court shall consider in favor of withholding or 3    minimizing a sentence of imprisonment prior to imposing 4    any sentence and may include testimony from family and 5    community members, written statements, video, and 6    documentation. Unless the court finds that the parent 7    poses a significant risk to the community that outweighs 8    the risk of harm from the parent's removal from the 9    family, the court shall impose a sentence in accordance 10    with subsection (b) that allows the parent to continue to 11    care for the child or children. 12        (19) The defendant serves as the caregiver for a 13    relative who is ill, disabled, or elderly. 14        (20) The defendant is convicted of a felony and is a 15    combat veteran who is a qualified service-disabled veteran 16    who has been diagnosed with post-traumatic stress 17    disorder. 18    (b) If the court, having due regard for the character of 19the offender, the nature and circumstances of the offense and 20the public interest finds that a sentence of imprisonment is 21the most appropriate disposition of the offender, or where 22other provisions of this Code mandate the imprisonment of the 23offender, the grounds listed in paragraph (a) of this 24subsection shall be considered as factors in mitigation of the 25term imposed.26(Source: P.A. 101-471, eff. 1-1-20; 102-211, eff. 1-1-22.)   SB1824- 6 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1    Section 10. The Veterans and Servicemembers Court 2Treatment Act is amended by adding Section 31 as follows: 3    (730 ILCS 167/31 new)4    Sec. 31. Combat veterans; post-traumatic stress disorder. 5    (a) In this Section:6    "Ambulance services" includes medical transportation 7services provided by means of an ambulance, helicopter, 8medi-car, service car, or taxi. 9    "Combat veteran" means an Illinois resident who is, or who 10was honorably discharged as, a member of the Armed Forces of 11the United States, a member of the Illinois National Guard, or 12a member of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the 13United States and who served on active duty in connection with 14World War II, the Korean War, Southeast Asia War, Persian Gulf 15War, Operation Desert Storm, Operation Enduring Freedom, 16Operation Iraqi Freedom or Operation Iraqi Freedom, or any 17other foreign military action authorized by the President of 18the United States, or in which a declaration of war was 19declared by the Congress of the United States and enacted into 20law. 21    "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the State or 22of a unit of local government charged with enforcement of 23State, county, or municipal laws or with managing custody of 24detained persons in the State.   SB1824- 7 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1    "Peace officer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 2Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 3    "Post-traumatic stress disorder" means a condition of 4persistent mental and emotional stress occurring as a result 5of injury or severe psychological shock, typically involving 6disturbance of sleep and constant vivid recall of the 7experience, with dulled responses to others and to the outside 8world. 9    "Qualified service-disabled veteran" means a veteran who 10has been found to have 10% or more service-connected 11disability by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs 12or the United States Department of Defense.13    (b) If a combat veteran who is a qualified 14service-disabled veteran is believed to have committed an 15offense or is in need of assistance as a result of a suspected 16incidence of post-traumatic stress disorder, a peace officer 17or an ambulance service shall transport the veteran to a 18Department of Veterans Affairs' hospital to be evaluated by a 19physician, psychiatrist, or clinical psychologist, or other 20medical professional that the hospital deems qualified to 21determine whether the veteran is a danger to himself, herself, 22or others.23    (c) If it is determined by the hospital staff who 24evaluated the veteran that the veteran is not a danger to 25himself, herself, or others, the person shall be released 26unless that person is subject to law enforcement agency   SB1824- 8 -LRB104 09456 RLC 19517 b1custody for commission of an offense that requires pretrial 2detention under Article 110 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 3of 1963. If the veteran requires detention, the veteran shall 4be released to law enforcement agency custody. 5    (d) If a combat veteran who is a qualified 6service-disabled veteran resides in this State and is charged 7with a criminal offense, regardless of the severity of the 8offense and regardless whether the veteran was in active 9military service at the time of the commission of the offense, 10the case shall be tried by a veterans and servicemembers court 11located in the veteran's county of residence, or if the 12veteran's county of residence does not have a veterans and 13servicemembers court located in that county, the case shall be 14tried in a veterans and servicemembers court located in the 15nearest county of the veteran's residence.16    (e) A diagnosis for post-traumatic stress disorder of the 17combat veteran who is a qualified service-disabled veteran and 18who is charged with a felony shall be taken into consideration 19by the State's Attorney and the court trying the veteran and 20shall be considered by the court as a mitigating factor in 21sentencing.